Nebraska, session 109, LB701.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB701 LB701
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 68-901, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
68-901 Sections 68-901 to 68-9,111 and section 2 of this act shall
be known and may be cited as the Medical Assistance Act.
Sec. 2. (1) The Legislature finds that: (a) Doula services have
been proven to reduce the cost of birthing and improve outcomes for
mothers and infants; (b) one of the most effective services to improve
labor and delivery outcomes is the continuous presence of support
personnel such as a doula; and (c) support from a doula is associated
with lower cesarean rates, as well as fewer obstetric interventions,
fewer complications, less pain medication, shorter labor hours, and
higher Apgar scores for infants.
(2) No later than January 1, 2027, the department shall reimburse a
provider for doula services. Such reimbursement shall be paid by state
funds at rates determined by the department. The department shall submit
a state plan amendment, if necessary, to provide for reimbursement of
doula services.
(3)(a) The department shall establish a work group of stakeholders
and experts to develop an implementation plan, including appropriate
reimbursement rates and appropriate training, certification, or
experience requirements for doula services. The work group shall submit
the implementation plan to the department no later than October 1, 2026.
(b) The work group shall be comprised of the following: (i) Thirty
percent of the members shall represent the doula profession; (ii) thirty
percent of the members shall represent communities of color
disproportionately impacted by poor birth outcomes; (iii) ten percent of
the members shall represent rural Nebraska; and (iv) ten percent of the
members shall have utilized doula services.
(c) Additional members of the group shall include, but not be
limited to: (i) Medical providers; (ii) public health professionals;
(iii) representatives of tribal organizations; and (iv) community
-2-

LB701 LB701
2025 2025
advocates.
(4)(a) For purposes of this section, doula means a trained
professional who provides emotional, physical, and informational support
for individuals before, during, and after labor and birth. This includes,
but is not limited to, attending prenatal visits, support during
delivery, and providing resources during the postpartum period.
(b) A doula shall have appropriate training, certification, or
experience, as determined by the implementation plan developed by the
work group described in subdivision (3)(a) of this section.
(c) A doula shall not perform clinical or medical tasks and shall
not diagnose or treat in any modality.
Sec. 3. Original section 68-901, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-3-